Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2609.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; roundabout; State Route 89A, Forest Road and Ranger Road The sum of $5,016,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the city of Sedona for roundabout construction and improvements at the intersection of State Route 89A, Forest Road and Ranger Road.